Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,289
Act, how construed; applicability
of act.

(1)
The courts of this state shall construe the provisions of the Successor Asbestos-Related
Liability Act liberally with regard to successor corporations.

(2) The act shall apply
to all asbestos claims filed against a successor corporation on or after July
15, 2010. The act also shall apply to any pending asbestos claims against
a successor corporation in which trial has not commenced as of July 15, 2010,
except that any provisions of the act which would be unconstitutional if applied
retroactively shall be applied prospectively only.

Laws 2010, LB763, § 7.